Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB1063.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 12b. (1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3), a cemetery owner that owns a crematory, or an operator of that cemetery owner, shall establish and maintain inside the crematory a refrigeration unit that is suitable for storing the bodies of deceased individuals. (2) If the body of a deceased individual is not cremated or embalmed within 24 hours after arrival at the crematory, the cemetery owner that owns the crematory or an operator of that cemetery owner shall ensure that the body of the deceased individual be stored in the refrigeration unit at an air temperature not to exceed 40 degrees Fahrenheit. (3) Subsection (1) does not apply to a cemetery owner that owns a crematory or an operator of that cemetery owner if either of the following conditions applies: (a) The cemetery owner or an operator of that cemetery owner has a contract with a person that owns a facility that is located within 50 miles of the crematory and that contains a refrigeration unit that is suitable for storing the bodies of deceased individuals. The contract must provide that the person will house, in the facility's refrigeration unit at an air temperature not to exceed 40 degrees Fahrenheit, the bodies of deceased individuals transported from the crematory. The facility's refrigeration unit must have the capacity to house each body of a deceased individual transported from the crematory. (b) The cemetery owner owns or operates a funeral establishment that is located within 50 miles of the crematory and that contains a refrigeration unit that is suitable for storing the bodies of deceased individuals. The cemetery owner or an operator of that cemetery owner shall ensure that the bodies of deceased individuals be transported to the cemetery owner's funeral establishment and stored in the funeral establishment's refrigeration unit at an air temperature not to exceed 40 degrees Fahrenheit. As used in this subdivision, "funeral establishment" means that term as defined in section 1801 of the occupational code, 1980 PA 299, MCL 399.1801. (4) A cemetery owner that owns a crematory and an operator of that cemetery owner shall ensure that the crematory complies with both of the following: (a) Article 18B of the occupational code, 1980 PA 299, MCL 339.1880 to 339.1890. (b) Part 138 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.13801 to 333.13832. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) Senate Bill No. 1060. (b) Senate Bill No. 1061. (c) Senate Bill No. 1068.